Maryland, session 2025, HB1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
9–102.
This title applies only in Allegany County.
9–1902.
(a) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A license holder may employ an individual between the ages of [16] 18 and
21 years.
(2) A LICENSE HOLDER THAT DERIVES MORE THAN HALF OF ITS
REVENUES FROM THE SALE OF FOOD MAY EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL BETWEEN THE
AGES OF 16 AND 21 YEARS.
– 1 –

Ch. 843 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) To be allowed to sell or serve beer, light wine, and liquor, an individual shall
be at least 18 years old.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –